Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1409
Lien satisfied; financing statement; termination.

When
an agricultural production input lien is satisfied, any
financing statement filed to perfect that lien shall be terminated in the
manner and form provided in article 9, Uniform Commercial Code.

Laws 1987, LB 101, § 9;

Laws 1988, LB 943, § 17;

Laws 1999, LB 550, § 33;

Laws 2001, LB 54, § 24;

Laws 2014, LB750, § 15.